hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Usluga prehrane > Automati: Automati s kombiniranim proizvodima; Automati s pićem; Automati s grickalicama
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Nahrungsmittelservice > Verkaufsautomaten: Kombi-Verkaufsautomaten; Getränkeautomaten; Snackautomaten
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Usługi gastronomiczne > Automaty sprzedające: Automaty sprzedające combo; Automaty sprzedające napoje; Automaty sprzedające przekąski
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Prehranske storitve > Prodajni avtomati: Kombinirani prodajni avtomati; Prodajni avtomati za pijačo; Prodajni avtomati za prigrizke
en: Business & Industrial > Food Service > Vending Machines: Combo Vending Machines; Drink Vending Machines; Snack Vending Machines
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > บริการอาหาร > ตู้ขายของอัตโนมัติ: ตู้ขายของอัตโนมัติแบบคอมโบรวม; ตู้ขายเครื่องดื่มอัตโนมัติ; ตู้ขายของกินเล่นอัตโนมัติ
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Yemek Servisi > Satış Otomatları: Kombine Otomatlar; İçecek Otomatları; Atıştırmalık Otomatları
it: Commercio e industria > Ristorazione > Distributori automatici: Distributori automatici combinati; Distributori automatici di bevande; Distributori automatici di snack
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Υπηρεσία φαγητού > Αυτόματοι πωλητές: Συνδυαστικοί αυτόματοι πωλητές; Αυτόματοι πωλητές ποτών; Αυτόματοι πωλητές σνακ
da: Erhverv og industri > Catering > Salgsautomater: Salgsautomater med mad og drikke; Salgsautomater med drikke; Salgsautomater med mad
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Обществено хранене > Вендинг автомати: Комбинирани вендинг автомати; Вендинг автомати за напитки; Вендинг автомати за закуски
nb: Forretninger og industri > Matservice > Salgsautomater: Kombinerte salgsautomater; Drikkeautomater; Snacksautomater
sv: Företag och industri > Livsmedelsservice > Varuautomater: Kombinerade varuautomater; Dryckesautomater; Snackautomater
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Stravovanie > Predajné automaty: Kombinované predajné automaty; Nápojové automaty; Automaty na občerstvenie
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Servicii alimentare > Distribuitoare automate: Distribuitoare automate combinate; Distribuitoare automate pentru băuturi; Distribuitoare automate pentru gustări
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Общественное питание > Торговые автоматы: Комбинированные торговые автоматы; Автоматы по продаже напитков; Автоматы по продаже снеков
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Ruokapalvelu > Välipala-automaatit: Yhdistelmäautomaatit; Juoma-automaatit; Välipala-automaatit
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Catering en horeca > Automaten: Combi-automaten; Drankautomaten; Snackautomaten
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 餐飲服務 > 自動販賣機: 組合自動販賣機; 飲料販賣機; 零食販賣機
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Restauration > Distributeurs automatiques: Distributeurs automatiques combinés; Distributeurs automatiques de boissons; Distributeurs automatiques de snacks
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Serviço de gastronomia > Máquinas automáticas de venda: Máquinas de venda combinadas; Máquinas de venda automática de bebidas; Máquinas de venda automática de comida
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Ételkiszolgálás > Automaták: Kombinált automaták; Italautomaták; Snack-automaták
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 요식업 > 자판기: 혼합 자판기; 음료수 자판기; 간식 자판기
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Ngành thực phẩm > Máy bán hàng tự động: Máy bán hàng tự động kết hợp; Máy bán đồ uống tự động; Máy bán đồ ăn nhẹ tự động
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Maitinimo paslaugos > Pardavimo automatai: Kombinuoti pardavimo automatai; Gėrimų pardavimo automatai; Užkandžių pardavimo automatai
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Serviço alimentar > Máquinas de vending: Máquinas de venda automática combinadas; Máquinas de venda automática de bebidas; Máquinas de venda automática de snacks
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Cateringové služby > Prodejní automaty: Kombinované prodejní automaty; Nápojové automaty; Prodejní automaty na snacky
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 飲食業 > 自動販売機: 複合自動販売機; 飲み物の自動販売機; スナック自動販売機
es: Economía e industria > Restauración > Máquinas expendedoras: Máquinas expendedoras combinadas; Máquinas expendedoras de bebidas; Máquinas expendedoras de snacks
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 餐饮服务 > 自动售货机: 组合自动售货机; 饮料自动售货机; 零食自动售货机